District of Columbia statutes.
28-5207

Presentation of price.

(a)

In any retail establishment in which the unit price information is provided in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, that information may be displayed by means of a sign that offers the unit price for one or more brands or sizes of a given commodity by means of a sticker, stamp, sign, label, or tag affixed to the shelf upon which the commodity is displayed, or by means of a sticker, stamp, sign, label, or tag affixed to the consumer commodity.

(b)

Where a sign providing unit price information for one or more sizes or brands of a given commodity is used, that sign shall be displayed clearly and in a non-deceptive manner in a central location as close as practical to all items to which the sign refers.

(c)

If a single sign or tag includes the unit price information for more than one brand or size of a given commodity, the following information shall be provided:

(1)

The identity and the brand name of the commodity.

(2)

The quantity of the packaged commodity; provided, that more than one package size per brand is displayed.

(3)

The total retail sales price.

(4)

The price per appropriate unit, in accordance with § 28-5206.

History

Apr. 23, 2013, D.C. Law 19-282, § 2(c), 60 DCR 2132